Massachusetts, session 194th, S1472.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 111M of chapter 41, is hereby amended by striking every
occurrence of the phrase “city or town or fire or water district” and inserting in place thereof the
following phrase “city or town or political subdivision thereof, including the Boston Public
Health Commission, or fire or water district”.
SECTION 2. Section 111N of chapter 41, is hereby amended by striking every
occurrence of the phrase “city or town” and inserting in place thereof the following phrase “city
or town, including political subdivisions thereof, including the Boston Public Health
Commission, and fire or water districts”.
of 1